Washington statutes.
RCW 6.23.050

Purchaser or redemptioner to file statements of amounts paid.

A purchaser or redemptioner who pays any taxes or assessments or has or acquires a lien on the property by judgment, decree, deed of trust, or mortgage prior to that of a prospective redemptioner must file a statement thereof, for recording, with the recording officer of the county in which the property is situated before the property has been redeemed from him or her. Otherwise, the property may be redeemed without paying such tax, assessment, or lien, but if actual notice of such payments or liens has been given to the person who redeems, failure to file the statement shall not affect the right to payment from that person absent that person's demonstration of prejudice resulting from the failure to file the statement.

[ 1987 c 442 s 705.]